New York, session 2025-2026, A8486.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 13-0340 of the environmental conservation law, as 2 amended by chapter 307 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 § 13-0340. Bluefish (Pomatomus saltatrix). 5 The department may, until December thirty-first, two thousand [twen- 6 ty-five] twenty-eight, fix by regulation measures for the management of 7 bluefish (Pomatomus saltatrix), including size limits, catch and 8 possession limits, open and closed seasons, closed areas, restrictions 9 on the manner of taking and landing, requirements for permits and eligi- 10 bility therefor, recordkeeping requirements, requirements on the amount 11 and type of fishing effort and gear, and requirements relating to trans- 12 portation, possession and sale, provided that such regulations are no 13 less restrictive than requirements set forth in this chapter and 14 provided further that such regulations are consistent with the compli- 15 ance requirements of applicable fishery management plans adopted by the 16 Atlantic States Marine Fisheries Commission and with applicable 17 provisions of fishery management plans adopted pursuant to the Federal 18 Fishery Conservation and Management Act (16 U.S.C. § 1800 et seq.). 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09955-01-5